Washington statutes.
RCW 12.04.206

Form of undertaking in replevin.

FORM OF UNDERTAKING IN REPLEVIN

Whereas, A B, plaintiff, has commenced an action before J P, one of the justices of the peace in and for . . . . . . county, against C D, defendant, for the recovery of certain personal property, mentioned and described in the affidavit of the plaintiff, to wit: [here set forth the property claimed]. Now, therefore we, A B, plaintiff, E F and G H, acknowledge ourselves bound unto C D in the sum of . . . . . . dollars for the prosecution of the action for the return of the property to the defendant, if return thereof be adjudged, and for the payment to him or her of such sum as may for any cause be recovered against the plaintiff.

Dated the . . . . day of . . . . . ., (year) . . . . A B, E F, G H.

[ 2016 c 202 s 17; 2010 c 8 s 3016; 1957 c 89 s 8. Prior: Code 1881 s 1885, part; 1873 p 373 c 16, part; 1863 p 370 c 16, part; 1854 p 253 c 19, part; RRS s 1890, part.]